Utah statutes.
13-31-201.   Ownership rights to molds.

(1)  Unless otherwise agreed to by the molder and the customer, the customer has all rights and title to a mold in the possession of the molder.

(2)  If a customer does not claim possession from a molder of a mold within three years following the last prior use of the mold, all rights and title to the mold may be transferred to the molder in accordance with Section 13-31-202 for the purpose of destroying or otherwise disposing of the mold.

